Washington statutes.
RCW 19.144.100

Unlawful actions—Proceeds and interest in real property—Criminal penalties.

(1)(a) It is unlawful for a person to use or invest proceeds, or any part of proceeds, knowing that the proceeds, or any part of the proceeds, were derived, directly or indirectly, from a pattern of mortgage fraud activity, in the acquisition of any title to, or any right, interest, or equity in, real property or in the establishment or operation of any enterprise.

(b) A violation of this subsection is a class B felony.

(2)(a) It is unlawful for a person to acquire or maintain, directly or indirectly, any interest in or control of any enterprise or real property knowing the interest or control was obtained through a pattern of mortgage fraud.

(b) A violation of this subsection is a class B felony.

(3)(a) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly conspire or attempt to violate subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

(b) A violation of this subsection is a class C felony.

[ 2008 c 108 s 11.]